District of Columbia statutes.
26-741

Rules.

(a)

The Superintendent [Commissioner], pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-142, § 12, 43 DCR 2159

History

Banks organized under federal law, application of District law, see § 26-710.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 26-861.

Prior Codifications